Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.200

Procedure on appeal—Perfecting appeal.

The decision of the council or other legislative body, upon any objections made in the manner and within the time herein prescribed, shall be final and conclusive, subject however to review by the superior court upon appeal. The appeal shall be made by filing written notice of appeal with the city or town clerk and with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the city or town is situated.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.200. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 2; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]